nl: Cilinderkop materiaalklasse: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Billet-staal; Gietijzer; Gietstaal; Magnesiumlegering; Overig
lt-LT: Cilindro galvutės medžiagos klasė: Aliuminis; Frezuotas aliuminis; Frezuotas plienas; Ketus; Lietas plienas; Magnio lydinys; Kita
sl-SI: Razred materiala glave valja: Aluminij; Stružen aluminij (billet); Struženo jeklo (billet); Litoželezo; Lito jeklo; Magnezijeva zlitina; Drugo
sv: Materialkvalitet för cylinderhuvud: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Billet-stål; Gjutjärn; Gjutstål; Magnesiumlegering; Annat
it: Grado del materiale della testata del cilindro: Alluminio; Alluminio ricavato dal pieno; Acciaio ricavato dal pieno; Ghisa; Acciaio fuso; Lega di magnesio; Altro
fr: Qualité du matériau de culasse: Aluminium; Aluminium taillé dans la masse; Acier taillé dans la masse; Fonte; Acier moulé; Alliage de magnésium; Autre
th: เกรดวัสดุของฝาสูบ: อะลูมิเนียม; อะลูมิเนียมบิลเล็ต; เหล็กบิลเล็ต; เหล็กหล่อ; เหล็กกล้าหล่อ; แมกนีเซียมอัลลอย; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Клас/марка на материала на цилиндровата глава: Алуминий; Фрезован алуминий; Фрезована стомана; Чугун; Лята стомана; Магнезиева сплав; Други
ja: シリンダーヘッドの素材グレード: アルミニウム; ビレットアルミニウム; ビレットスチール; 鋳鉄; 鋳鋼; マグネシウム合金; その他
el: Βαθμός υλικού κυλινδροκεφαλής: Αλουμίνιο; Billet αλουμίνιο; Billet ατσάλι; Χυτοσίδηρος; Χυτοχάλυβας; Κράμα μαγνησίου; Άλλο
vi: Cấp độ vật liệu đầu xi lanh: Nhôm; Nhôm nguyên khối; Thép nguyên khối; Gang; Thép đúc; Hợp kim magie; Khác
hu: Hengerfej anyagminősége: Alumínium; Tömbből mart alumínium; Tömbből mart acél; Öntöttvas; Acélöntvény; Magnéziumötvözet; Egyéb
nb: Materialkvalitet for sylinderhode: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Billet-stål; Støpejern; Støpestål; Magnesiumlegering; Annet
sk-SK: Trieda materiálu hlavy valcov: Hliník; Kovaný hliník; Kovaná oceľ; Liatina; Oceľoliatina; Horčíková zliatina; Iné
ro-RO: Gradul materialului chiulasei: Aluminiu; Aluminiu prelucrat din bloc (billet); Oțel prelucrat din bloc (billet); Fontă; Oțel turnat; Aliaj de magneziu; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta materijala glave cilindra: Aluminij; Strojno obrađeni aluminij; Strojno obrađeni čelik; Lijevano željezo; Lijevani čelik; Legura magnezija; Ostalo
fi: Sylinterikannen materiaaliluokka: Alumiini; Billet-alumiini; Billet-teräs; Valurauta; Valuteräs; Magnesiumseos; Muu
zh-CN: 气缸盖材料等级: 铝; 方坯铝; 钢锭; 铸铁; 铸钢; 镁合金; 其他
cs: Druh materiálu hlavy válců: Hliník; Frézovaný hliník; Frézovaná ocel; Litina; Ocelolitina; Slitina hořčíku; Jiné
pl: Klasa materiału głowicy cylindra: Aluminium; Aluminium z bloku; Stal z bloku; Żeliwo; Staliwo; Stop magnezu; Inny
tr: Silindir kapağı malzeme kalitesi: Alüminyum; Billet alüminyum; Billet çelik; Dökme demir; Dökme çelik; Magnezyum alaşımı; Diğer
pt-BR: Grau do material do cabeçote do cilindro: Alumínio; Alumínio billet; Aço billet; Ferro fundido; Aço fundido; Liga de magnésio; Outros
es: Grado del material de la culata: Aluminio; Aluminio billet; Acero billet; Hierro fundido; Acero fundido; Aleación de magnesio; Otro
de: Materialgüte des Zylinderkopfs: Aluminium; Billet-Aluminium; Billet-Stahl; Gusseisen; Stahlguss; Magnesiumlegierung; Sonstige
ko: 실린더 헤드 재질 등급: 알루미늄; 빌렛 알루미늄; 빌렛 스틸; 주철; 주강; 마그네슘 합금; 기타
ru: Материал и марка головки блока цилиндров: Алюминий; Фрезерованный алюминий; Фрезерованная сталь; Чугун; Литая сталь; Магниевый сплав; Другое
pt-PT: Grau do material da cabeça do cilindro: Alumínio; Alumínio maquinado; Aço maquinado; Ferro fundido; Aço fundido; Liga de magnésio; Outro
en: Cylinder head material grade: Aluminum; Billet aluminum; Billet steel; Cast iron; Cast steel; Magnesium alloy; Other
zh-TW: 汽缸蓋材質等級: 鋁; 鋁錠; 鋼錠; 鑄鐵; 鑄鋼; 鎂合金; 其他
da: Materialekvalitet for topstykke: Aluminium; Fræset aluminium; Fræset stål; Støbejern; Støbestål; Magnesiumlegering; Andet